Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3327
Legal service insurance corporation; taxation provisions applicable.

Any corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall also be subject to the taxation provisions of Chapter 77, article 9, to the extent that direct writing premiums are subject to taxation under such article.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 27.